Illinois, session 104th, SB746.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 30/1)  (from Ch. 111, par. 8401-1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act.10(Source: P.A. 97-1141, eff. 12-28-12.)